Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.210

Beneficiary trustee—Disregard of provision conferring absolute or similar power—Power of removal.

If a trustee is a beneficiary of the trust and the trust instrument confers the power to make distributions of principal or income for the trustee's health, education, support, or maintenance as described in section 2041 or 2514 of the Internal Revenue Code and the applicable regulations adopted under that section, then a trust provision purporting to confer "absolute," "sole," "complete," "conclusive," or a similar discretion relating to the exercise of such trustee powers shall be disregarded in the exercise of the power, and the power may then only be exercised reasonably and in accordance with the ascertainable standard as set forth in RCW 11.98.200 and this section. A person who has the right to remove or to replace a trustee does not possess nor may the person be deemed to possess by virtue of having that right the powers of the trustee who is subject to removal or replacement.

[ 1993 c 339 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1993 c 339: See note following RCW 11.98.200.